Vermont, session 2025-2026, S238.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Vermont’s most recent Housing Needs Assessment estimates that the
pace of home building will need to increase to create between 24,000 and
36,000 additional year-round homes in 2025–2029 to meet demand, normalize
VT LEG #385761 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.238
2026 Page 2 of 14
vacancy rates, house the homeless, and replace homes lost from the stock
through flooding and other causes.
(2) Of these homes, the shortage is most marked for Vermonters with
low income, or households that earn less than 120 percent of the Area Median
Income as defined by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban
Development (HUD). Assuming a midpoint target of 30,000 homes and
apartments from the Housing Needs Assessment, half of them, or 15,000,
would need public subsidies to be affordable to households earning less than
80 percent HUD’s Area Median Income.
(3) Subsidies are also often needed to construct housing for households
earning between 80 percent and 120 percent of HUD’s Area Median Income.
Another 5,000 homes are needed to meet Vermonters’ housing needs.
(4) To meet Vermont’s stated goal of constructing new housing units,
two-thirds of the units will need targeted public subsidies to meet the housing
needs of Vermont, or an estimated 4,000 publicly subsidized housing units per
year out of 7,500 units per year that it is estimated that we need.
(5) Since 2020, the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board has
supported the creation and preservation of housing and shelter for over 5,000
households across Vermont.
VT LEG #385761 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.238
2026 Page 3 of 14
(6) Continued financial support of the Vermont Housing Improvement
Program is needed. This program helps Vermont bring back housing that is
vacant, dilapidated, non-code compliant, or unweatherized.
(7) The need for service supported housing is growing and largely
unmet. Whether it’s housing for persons with intellectual developmental
disabilities, those in transition, those with mental health needs, or persons with
physical disabilities, we need more supportive housing. The 2025 Acts and
Resolves No. 69 State Housing and Residential Services Planning Committee
has determined an urgent need of 600-plus service supported housing units for
persons with developmental disabilities alone.
(8) At current budget levels and with no new revenue, Vermont is
projected to create between 150 and 200 housing units affordable to
households earning less than 80 percent of HUD’s Area Median Income per
year.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. chapter 225, subchapter 5 is added to read:
Subchapter 5. Rooms Tax Housing Surcharge
§ 9311. IMPOSITION; ROOMS TAX HOUSING SURCHARGE
(a) An operator shall collect a surcharge of two percent of the rent of each
occupancy subject to tax under subsection 9241(a) of this title.
(b) The surcharge shall be in addition to any tax assessed under section
9241 of this chapter. The surcharge assessed under this section shall be paid,
VT LEG #385761 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.238
2026 Page 4 of 14
collected, remitted, and enforced under this chapter in the same manner as the
rooms tax assessed under section 9241 of this title.
(c) The surcharge shall be itemized on the invoice or bill and include a
statement that the surcharge is “for support of Vermont’s Housing Investments
Special Fund.”
Sec. 3. 32 V.S.A. chapter 227 is added to read:
CHAPTER 227. SUGAR-SWEETENED BEVERAGE TAX
§ 9401. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Beverage for medical use” means a beverage suitable for human
consumption and manufactured for use as an oral nutritional therapy for
persons who cannot absorb or metabolize dietary nutrients from food or
beverages or for use as an oral rehydration electrolyte solution for infants and
children formulated to prevent or treat dehydration due to illness. “Beverage
for medical use” also means a “medical food” as defined in subdivision
(5)(b)(3) of the Orphan Drug Act, 21 U.S.C. § 360ee. “Beverage for medical
use” does not include drinks commonly referred to as sports drinks or any
other common names that are derivations thereof.
(2) “Caloric sweetener” means any caloric substance suitable for human
consumption that humans perceive as sweet and includes, without limitation,
sucrose, fructose, glucose, fruit juice concentrate, or other sugars. “Caloric
VT LEG #385761 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.238
2026 Page 5 of 14
sweetener” excludes noncaloric sweeteners. As used in this definition,
“caloric” means a substance that adds calories to the diet of a person who
consumes that substance.
(3) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Taxes and the
Commissioner’s authorized agents and employees.
(4) “Consumer” means a person who purchases or otherwise obtains a
sugar-sweetened beverage for consumption and not for sale to another.
(5) “Department” means the Vermont Department of Taxes.
(6) “Distribution” or “Distribute” means the transfer of title or
possession from one person to another for consideration or within a business
entity or between or among business entities subject to the same ownership or
control, such as by a wholesale or warehousing unit to a retail outlet or
between two or more employees or contractors. “Distribution” or “Distribute”
does not mean the retail sale to a consumer.
(7) “Distributor” means any person, including a manufacturer and a
wholesale dealer, that receives, stores, manufactures, bottles, or distributes
syrup, powder, or sugar-sweetened beverages for sale to retailers, whether or
not that person also sells such products to consumers. “Distributor” also
means any person importing or causing to be imported syrup, powder, or
sugar-sweetened beverages into the State from outside the State for sale to a
retailer or consumer.
VT LEG #385761 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.238
2026 Page 6 of 14
(8) “Place of business” means any place where syrup, powder, or
sugar-sweetened beverages are manufactured or received for sale in the State.
(9) “Powder” means any solid mixture of ingredients used in making,
mixing, or compounding sugar-sweetened beverages by mixing the powder
with any one or more other ingredients, including water, ice, syrup, simple
syrup, fruits, vegetables, fruit juice, vegetable juice, or carbonation or
other gas.
(10) “Retailer” means any person that sells syrup, powder, or
sugar-sweetened beverages to consumers in the State.
(11) “Sale” means the transfer of title or possession for valuable
consideration regardless of the manner by which the transfer is completed.
(12) “Sugar-sweetened beverage” means any nonalcoholic beverage,
carbonated or noncarbonated, that is intended for human consumption as a
beverage and contains any added sweetener. As used in this definition,
“nonalcoholic beverage” means any beverage that contains less than one-half
of one percent alcohol per volume.
(13) “Sweetener” means any caloric substance suitable for human
consumption that humans perceive as sweet and includes sucrose, fructose,
glucose, other sugars, or fruit juice concentrates but does not include any
substance that adds fewer than five calories per reference amount customarily
consumed or per labeled serving.
VT LEG #385761 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.238
2026 Page 7 of 14
(14) “Syrup” means a liquid mixture of ingredients used in making,
mixing, or compounding sugar-sweetened beverages using one or more other
ingredients, such as water, ice, powder, simple syrup, fruits, vegetables, fruit
juice, vegetable juice, or carbonation or other gas.
§ 9402. TAX IMPOSED
(a) There is imposed an excise tax on every distributor of $0.01 per ounce
of sugar-sweetened beverages sold in the State.
(b) There is imposed an excise tax on every distributor of $0.01 per ounce
of syrup and powder sold in the State. For purposes of calculating the tax
under this subsection, the taxable volume of syrup or powder shall be equal to
the largest volume of sugar-sweetened beverage resulting from use of the syrup
or powder according to the manufacturer’s instructions.
§ 9403. RETURNS AND REMITTANCES
(a) Any distributor liable for the tax imposed by this chapter shall, on or
before the 15th day of every month, return to the Commissioner, under oath of
a person with legal authority to bind the distributor, a statement containing its
name and place of business, the quantity of syrup, powder, and
sugar-sweetened beverages subject to the excise tax imposed by this chapter
sold in the preceding month, and any other information required by the
Commissioner, along with the tax due.
VT LEG #385761 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.238
2026 Page 8 of 14
(b) The Commissioner shall deposit revenue from the tax imposed by this
chapter into the Education Fund pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 4025(a)(11).
§ 9404. RECORDS
Every distributor shall maintain, for not less than three years, accurate
records showing all transactions subject to tax liability under this chapter.
Distributors must identify the amount of tax collected as a separate invoice
entry on sales to retailers. These records are subject to inspection by the
Commissioner at all reasonable times during normal business hours.
§ 9405. EXEMPTIONS
The following shall be exempt from the tax imposed by section 9402 of this
chapter:
(1) Syrup, powder, or sugar-sweetened beverages sold to the
U.S. government, its subdivisions, or under any other circumstances in which
the State is without power to impose the tax.
(2) Syrup, powder, or sugar-sweetened beverages sold by a distributor
for resale or consumption outside the State.
(3) Syrup, powder, or sugar-sweetened beverages sold by a distributor to
another distributor and not intended for resale to a consumer if the purchasing
distributor holds a license issued under section 9407 of this chapter and if the
sales invoice clearly indicates that the sale is exempt.
VT LEG #385761 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.238
2026 Page 9 of 14
(4) Beverages sweetened solely with noncaloric sweeteners.
(5) Beverages in which milk, or soy, rice, or similar milk substitute, is
the primary ingredient or the first listed ingredient on the label of the beverage.
(6) Coffee or tea without added caloric sweetener.
(7) Infant formula.
(8) Beverages for medical use.
(9) Water without any caloric sweeteners.
(10) Beverages consisting of 100 percent natural fruit or vegetable juice
with no added sweetener. As used in this subdivision, “natural fruit juice” and
“natural vegetable juice” mean the original liquid resulting from the pressing
of fruits or vegetables or the liquid resulting from the dilution of dehydrated
natural fruit juice or natural vegetable juice.
§ 9406. LICENSE REQUIRED
Each distributor shall secure a license from the Commissioner before
engaging in the business of selling sugar-sweetened beverages in the State.
§ 9407. APPLICATION FOR AND ISSUANCE OF LICENSE
(a) A separate application and license is required for each wholesale outlet
when a distributor owns or controls more than one such outlet.
(b) Licenses shall be issued by the Commissioner on application, without
charge, on forms prescribed by the Commissioner, stating the name and
address of the applicant, the address of the place of business, the type of
VT LEG #385761 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.238
2026 Page 10 of 14
business, and any other information the Commissioner may require for the
proper administration of this chapter.
§ 9408. TERM OF LICENSES
Each license issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be valid,
provided the licensee continues to do business at the place named, unless the
license is revoked or suspended by the Commissioner as provided in section
9409 of this chapter. If the business is sold or transferred or if the licensee
ceases to do business at the place named, the license shall immediately be
returned to the Commissioner for cancellation.
§ 9409. REVOCATION AND SUSPENSION OF LICENSES
The Commissioner may revoke or suspend the license of any licensee for
failure to comply with any provision of this chapter or for failure to comply
with the provisions of 11 V.S.A. chapter 15.
§ 9410. PENALTIES
(a) Any person subject to the provisions of this chapter that fails to pay the
tax imposed by this chapter on or before the date that payment is due or fails to
submit a return as required by this chapter is subject to the interest and
penalties provisions of section 3202 of this title.
(b) Any person subject to the provisions of this chapter that sells or offers
for sale any syrup, powder, or sugar-sweetened beverages in the State without
VT LEG #385761 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.238
2026 Page 11 of 14
holding a license as required by this chapter is liable for a penalty of up to
$100.00 for each day such sales are made or offered.
§ 9411. APPEALS
Any person aggrieved by an action taken by the Commissioner under this
chapter may appeal in writing to the Commissioner for a review. The
Commissioner shall then grant a hearing under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 and notify
the aggrieved person in writing of the Commissioner’s determination. The
Commissioner’s determination may be appealed within 30 days to the Superior
Court of the county of this State in which the taxpayer resides or has a place of
business or to the Superior Court of Washington County.
§ 9412. BONDING
When the Commissioner, in the Commissioner’s discretion, considers it
necessary to protect the revenues raised under this chapter, the Commissioner
may require any licensee to file with the Commissioner a bond under the terms
of section 3114 of this title.
§ 9413. RULES
The Commissioner is authorized to adopt rules and procedures to
accomplish the purposes of this chapter.
Sec. 4. 16 V.S.A. § 4025 is amended to read:
§ 4025. EDUCATION FUND
VT LEG #385761 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.238
2026 Page 12 of 14
(a) The Education Fund is established to comprise the following:
* * *
(11) revenues from the short-term rental surcharge sugar-sweetened
beverage tax under 32 V.S.A. § 9301 9402.
* * *
Sec. 5. 10 V.S.A. chapter 3 is added to read:
CHAPTER 3. HOUSING INVESTMENTS SPECIAL FUND
§ 22. HOUSING INVESTMENTS SPECIAL FUND
(a) Creation. There is established the Housing Investments Special Fund to
be administered by the Vermont Housing Conservation Board. Monies in the
Fund shall be used to help create, preserve, or improve housing stock. Projects
supported by the Fund may include affordable housing units, permanently
affordable housing units, service-supported housing units, or transitional
housing.
(b) Funds. The Fund shall consist of:
(1) revenue from the short-term rental surcharge under 32 V.S.A.
§ 9301;
(2) revenue from the rooms tax surcharge under 32 V.S.A. § 9311;
(3) any amounts transferred to it by the General Assembly; and
(4) any interest earned by the Fund.
VT LEG #385761 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.238
2026 Page 13 of 14
(c) Fund balance. Any balance remaining at the end of the fiscal year shall
remain in the Fund.
(d) Receipts. The Commissioner of Finance and Management may
anticipate receipts to this Fund and issue warrants based thereon.
(e) Appropriations required. Expenditures shall only be made from the
Fund through appropriation by the General Assembly.
(f) Intended use of Fund. It is the intent of the General Assembly to
appropriate not less than $5,000,000.00 from the Fund annually to the
Department of Housing and Community Development for the Vermont
Housing Improvement Program and to appropriate the remaining balance of
revenue anticipated to be deposited into the Fund each year to the Vermont
Housing and Conservation Board to support housing development projects,
including the development of affordable housing units, permanently affordable
housing units, service-supported housing units, and transitional housing.
(g) Reporting. Prior to January 31 of each year, the Vermont Housing and
Conservation Board shall submit a report on the investments made from the
Housing Investments Special Fund to the Governor and to the House
Committees on General and Housing, on Ways and Means, and on
Appropriations and the Senate Committees on Appropriations, on Finance, and
on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs. The report shall
include a list and description of projects funded by the Fund during the
VT LEG #385761 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.238
2026 Page 14 of 14
preceding fiscal year. For each project, the report shall list the amount
awarded, the geographic location, the number of homes created or preserved,
and the term and level of affordability of those homes.
Sec. 6. HOUSING INVESTMENTS SPECIAL FUND; APPROPRIATION
(a) In fiscal year 2027, $5,000,000.00 is appropriated from the Housing
Investments Special Fund to the Department of Housing and Community
Development to be expended on the Vermont Housing Improvement Program.
(b) In fiscal year 2027, $14,500,000.00 is appropriated from the Housing
Investments Special Fund to the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board to
support housing development projects in accordance with 10 V.S.A. § 22(a).
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on August 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385761 v.1